Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5528.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. It is unlawful and constitutes the crime of riot for if 5 or more persons, individuals, acting in concert, to wrongfully engage in violent conduct and thereby intentionally or recklessly cause or create a serious risk of causing public terror or alarm. Sec. 2. It is unlawful and constitutes incitement to riot for a person or persons, if an individual or individuals, intending to cause or to aid or abet the institution or maintenance of a riot, to do an act or engage in conduct that urges other persons individuals to commit acts of unlawful force or violence, or the unlawful burning or destroying of property, or the unlawful interference with a police officer, peace officer, fireman firefighter, or a member of the Michigan national guard, or any unit of the armed services officially assigned to riot duty in the lawful performance of his duty.those duties. The right to peacefully protest is a constitutionally protected fundamental right under both the freedom of speech and freedom of association clauses under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and sections 3 and 5 of article I of the state constitution of 1963, and is not a violation of this section.